North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Part 2. Commissioner of Agriculture.

§ 106-10.
Election; term; vacancy.

The Commissioner of Agriculture shall be elected at the general election for other State officers, shall be voted for on the same ballot with such officers, and his term of office shall be four years, and until his successor is elected and qualified. Any vacancy in the office of such Commissioner shall be filled by the Governor, the appointee to hold until the next regular election to the office and the qualification of his successor.

History.

1901, c. 479, s. 4; Rev., s. 3938; C.S., s. 4675.

§ 106-11.
Salary of Commissioner of Agriculture.

The salary of the Commissioner of Agriculture shall be set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act. In addition to the salary set by the General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, longevity pay shall be paid on the same basis as is provided to employees of the State who are subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act.

History.

1901, c. 479, s. 4; 1905, c. 529; Rev., s. 2749; 1907, c. 887, s. 1; 1913, c. 58; C. S., s. 3872; 1921, c. 25, s. 1; 1933, c. 282, s. 5; 1935, c. 293; 1937, c. 415; 1939, c. 338; 1943, c. 499, s. 1; 1947, c. 1041; 1949, c. 1278; 1953, c. 1, s. 2; 1957, c. 1; 1963, c. 1178, s. 4; 1967, c. 1130; c. 1237, s. 4; 1969, c. 1214, s. 4; 1971, c. 912, s. 4; 1973, c. 778, s. 4; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 19; 1977, c. 802, s. 42.10; 1983, c. 761, s. 208; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1987, c. 738, s. 32(b); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Act” for “State Personnel Act” at the end of the last sentence.

§§ 106-12,
106-13.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, ss. 3 and
4.

§ 106-14.
To establish regulations for transportation of livestock.

The Commissioner of Agriculture, by and with the consent and advice of the Board of Agriculture, shall promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the proper transporting of livestock by motor vehicle, and may require a permit for such vehicles if it becomes necessary in order to prevent the spread of animal diseases. This section shall not apply to any county having a local law providing for the vaccination of hogs against cholera.

History.

1937, c. 427, ss. 1, 2.